lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VII_Class=VII_d_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VII_Class=VII_d_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_Class=VII_d_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_d                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_d_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VII_Class=VII_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VII_Class=VII_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_d, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_d_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:sininiigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0PlSubj:sinoogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgObvSubj:sininiigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgSubj:sinoogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:sinoogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0SgObvSubj:sininigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+%0SgSubj:sinoogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:sininig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlSubj:sinog EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0PlSubj:sinok EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObvSubj:sininig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgSubj:sinog EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgSubj:sinok EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:sininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0PlSubj:sinoogiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObvSubj:sininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgSubj:sinoogiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0PlObvSubj:inigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0PlSubj:ogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObvSubj:inigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObvSubj:ininigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgSubj:ogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0PlSubj:ogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0SgObvSubj:inigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+%0SgSubj:ogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:inig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlObvSubj:ininig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlSubj:k EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0PlSubj:kin EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObvSubj:inig EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgSubj:k EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:inigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlObvSubj:ininigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0PlSubj:kiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObvSubj:inigiban EncliticRoot ;
+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgSubj:kiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary
0:%>%> VII_Class=VII_n_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_n_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VII_Class=VII_n_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_Class=VII_n_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Class=VII_n_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VII_Class=VII_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VII_Class=VII_n_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VII, Class: VII_n, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_Stems
aabita-niibin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aanikoosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aasamaatesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aaswaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aateyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aawan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aayenaabiisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aazhawaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
aazhigijisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agawaatebiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agogin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agwaagwaabikisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agwaayaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
agwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
akiiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
animaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
animibiisaan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
animikosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
animwewejiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
anwaatin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apagadaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apiichigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apiita'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apiitadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
apiitan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ashidaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ashkin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
awan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ayawan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ayishpisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
azhashkiiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
azheyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baabaakaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baabiiwaandagaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baagisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baakawan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baakisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baapaagaakwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baashkine-biiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
baawanadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
babaamaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
babiikwadaawangaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bagamaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bagaskisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bakaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bakijisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bakwajisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
banaajisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bashkobiisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bejigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bengwashkaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bibagaakwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bigiiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biichi-niibin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biidaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biigijiisagowan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biijijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biindaabiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biinjisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biitoosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
biiwaawangisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bikosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimaabiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimidagoojin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bimijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
binaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
bookwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
daangisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dabasaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dakaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dakiiwagisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dakwaakojii-manoomin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dasinoon:dasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dazhwegaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
desaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
dwaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gaapan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gagiizhibaayaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gakakisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gashkawanibiisaan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gibaakwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gichi-noodin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gidaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
giishkadaawangaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
giizhigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gimiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gipagaakwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gizhibaayaajiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gizhiiwegaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gizhiiyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gwaashkwesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
gwayakwaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ikosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
inaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
inwewesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ishkwesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ishpi-ziigwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
izhijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
jekadaawangisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
maadaa'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
maajiiyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
maazhisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
madwegamisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
madweyaabikisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
madwezigwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
maminogin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mashkawaagonewadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mashkawijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mazinaatebiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
michisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
miikogin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
minogin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
minwewebagaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
minweweyaandagaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mitaabiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mizhishawisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
mooshka'an VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
naananinoon:naananin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
naazhakiiyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
namajisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
napaajiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
nibaadwewesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
nigiigwakamikadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
niigaanisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
niiskaajibiisaan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
niizhinoon:niizhin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ningiigwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ningwaagonesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
nisawisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
noodin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ojichaagobiishin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
okwaakosinoon:okwaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ombweyaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ondaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
onjijiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
oshkayi'iiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ozhigin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
waabani-noodin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
waasishin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
waawiyejiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
wakewan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
wawanisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
webaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
wiinakamigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zaagaabiigisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zaagidaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zaagizigwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zagaakwadin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhaagigamiiwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhagashkaasin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zheyaakosin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhiiwaagamisin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
zhingadesin VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
ziigwan VII_Class=VII_n_Boundary ;
